Massachusetts, session 194th, S2101.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 3 of the general laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 38C the
following section:-
Section 38D.
Within 4 weeks of the appointment of joint standing committees in the first annual
session of the General Court, each joint standing committee shall adopt rules of procedure
regarding its conduct. Adoption and amendment of said rules shall require the joint agreement of
the house and senate chairs of said joint committee. Said rules of procedure, together with any
amendments, shall be filed with the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House and shall be
available to the public and members of the General Court on the official website for the General
Court.
A joint committee shall only initiate a poll of joint committee members upon joint
agreement of the house and senate chairs of the joint committee.
of 2

Joint committees shall report all matters back to the branch of origin, unless otherwise
specifically agreed to by joint agreement of the house and senate chairs of the joint committee.
of 2